North Carolina statutes. Chapter 19. Offenses Against Public Morals.
Article 1. Abatement of Nuisances.

§ 19-1.
What are nuisances under this Chapter.

The erection, establishment, continuance, maintenance, use, ownership or leasing of any building or place for the purpose of assignation, prostitution, gambling, illegal possession or sale of alcoholic beverages, illegal possession or sale of controlled substances as defined in the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, or illegal possession or sale of obscene or lewd matter, as defined in this Chapter, shall constitute a nuisance. The activity sought to be abated need not be the sole purpose of the building or place in order for it to constitute a nuisance under this Chapter.

The erection, establishment, continuance, maintenance, use, ownership or leasing of any building or place wherein or whereon are carried on, conducted, or permitted repeated acts which create and constitute a breach of the peace shall constitute a nuisance.

(b1)

The erection, establishment, continuance, maintenance, use, ownership or leasing of any building or place wherein or whereon are carried on, conducted, or permitted repeated activities or conditions which violate a local ordinance regulating sexually oriented businesses so as to contribute to adverse secondary impacts shall constitute a nuisance.

(b2)

The erection, establishment, continuance, maintenance, use, ownership, or leasing of any building or place for the purpose of carrying on, conducting, or engaging in any activities in violation of

G.S. 14-72.7

.

The building, place, vehicle, or the ground itself, in or upon which a nuisance as defined in subsection (a), (b), or (b1) of this section is carried on, and the furniture, fixtures, and contents, are also declared a nuisance, and shall be enjoined and abated as hereinafter provided.

No nuisance action under this Article may be brought against a place or business which is subject to regulation under Chapter 18B of the General Statutes when the basis for the action constitutes a violation of laws or regulations under that Chapter pertaining to the possession or sale of alcoholic beverages.

History.

Pub. Loc. 1913, c. 761, s. 25; 1919, c. 288; C.S., s. 3180; 1949, c. 1164; 1967, c. 142; 1971, c. 655; 1977, c. 819, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 747, s. 66; 1998-46, s. 7; 1999-371, s. 1; 2007-178, s. 3; 2013-229, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to criminal actions for prostitution, see

G.S. 14-203

et seq.; for gambling, see

G.S. 14-289

et seq.; for unlawful sale of whiskey, see

G.S. 18B-304

.

As to constitutionality of final judgment and order under this Article, see note to

G.S. 19-5

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-178, s. 3, effective December 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date, added subsection (b2).

Session Laws 2013-229, s. 1, effective July 3, 2013, added the last sentence in subsection (a); and added subsection (d). For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on estuarine pollution, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 921 (1971).

For survey of 1977 constitutional law, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 943 (1978).

For article, “Regulating Obscenity Through the Power to Define and Abate Nuisances,” see 14 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (1978).

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1088 (1981).

For note on control of obscenity through enforcement of a nuisance statute, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 139 (1981).

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For comment discussing the constitutionality of North Carolina’s nuisance abatement statute, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 685 (1983).

For article, “Obscenity: The Justices’ (Not So) New Robes,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 387 (1986).

§ 19-1.1.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter relating to illegal possession or sale of obscene matter or to the other conduct prohibited in

G.S. 19-1(a)

, the following definitions shall apply:

“Breach of the peace” means repeated acts that disturb the public order including, but not limited to, homicide, assault, affray, communicating threats, unlawful possession of dangerous or deadly weapons, and discharging firearms.

(1a)

“Knowledge” or “knowledge of such nuisance” means having knowledge of the contents and character of the patently offensive sexual conduct which appears in the lewd matter, or knowledge of the acts of lewdness. With regard to nuisances involving assignation, prostitution, gambling, the illegal possession or sale of alcoholic beverages, the illegal possession or sale of controlled substances as defined in the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, or repeated acts which create and constitute a breach of the peace, evidence that the defendant knew or by the exercise of due diligence should have known of the acts or conduct constitutes proof of knowledge.

“Lewd matter” is synonymous with “obscene matter” and means any matter:

Which the average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest; and

Which depicts patently offensive representations of:

Ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simulated;

Masturbation, excretory functions, or lewd exhibition of the genitals or genital area;

Masochism or sadism; or

Sexual acts with a child or animal.

Nothing herein contained is intended to include or proscribe any writing or written material, nor to include or proscribe any matter which, when considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is used, possesses serious literary, artistic, political, educational, or scientific value.

“Lewdness” is synonymous with obscenity and shall mean the act of selling, exhibiting or possessing for sale or exhibition lewd matter.

“Matter” means a motion picture film or a publication or both.

“Motion picture film” shall include any:

Film or plate negative;

Film or plate positive;

Film designed to be projected on a screen for exhibition;

Films, glass slides or transparencies, either in negative or positive form, designed for exhibition by projection on a screen;

Video tape, compact disc, digital video disc, or any other medium used to electronically reproduce images on a screen.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, association, corporation, or other legal entity.

“Place” includes, but is not limited to, any building, structure or places, or any separate part or portion thereof, whether permanent or not, or the ground itself.

(7a)

“Preserving the status quo” as used in

G.S. 19-2.3

means returning conditions to the last actual, peaceable, lawful, and noncontested status which preceded the pending controversy and not allow the nuisance to continue.

(7b)

“Prostitution” means offering in any manner or receiving of the body in return for a fee, for acts of vaginal intercourse, anal intercourse, fellatio, cunnilingus, masturbation, or physical contact with a person’s genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or breasts, or other acts of sexual conduct offered or received for pay and sexual gratification.

“Publication” shall include any book, magazine, pamphlet, illustration, photograph, picture, sound recording, or a motion picture film which is offered for sale or exhibited in a coin-operated machine.

“Sale of obscene or lewd matter” means a passing of title or right of possession from a seller to a buyer for valuable consideration, and shall include, but is not limited to, any lease or rental arrangement or other transaction wherein or whereby any valuable consideration is received for the use of, or transfer or possession of, lewd matter.

“Sale” as the term relates to proscribed acts other than sale of obscene or lewd matter shall have the same meaning as the term is defined in Chapter 18B and Chapter 90 of the General Statutes prohibiting the illegal sale of alcoholic beverages and controlled substances respectively.

“Used for profit” shall mean any use of real or personal property to produce income in any manner, including, but not limited to, any commercial or business activities, or selling, leasing, or otherwise providing goods and services for profit.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 3; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 747, s. 66; 1999-371, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, see G.S. 90-86 et seq.

§ 19-1.2.
Types of nuisances.

The following are declared to be nuisances wherein obscene or lewd matter or other conduct prohibited in

G.S. 19-1(a)

is involved:

Any and every place in the State where lewd films are publicly exhibited as a predominant and regular course of business, or possessed for the purpose of such exhibition;

Any and every place in the State where a lewd film is publicly and repeatedly exhibited, or possessed for the purpose of such exhibition;

Any and every lewd film which is publicly exhibited, or possessed for such purpose at a place which is a nuisance under this Article;

Any and every place of business in the State in which lewd publications constitute a principal or substantial part of the stock in trade;

Any and every lewd publication possessed at a place which is a nuisance under this Article;

Every place which, as a regular course of business, is used for the purposes of lewdness, assignation, gambling, the illegal possession or sale of alcoholic beverages, the illegal possession or sale of controlled substances as defined in the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, or prostitution, and every such place in or upon which acts of lewdness, assignation, gambling, the illegal possession or sale of alcoholic beverages, the illegal possession or sale of controlled substances as defined in the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, or prostitution, are held or occur.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 3; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 747, s. 66; 1999-371, s. 3.

§ 19-1.3.
Personal property as a nuisance; knowledge of nuisance.

The following are also declared to be nuisances, as personal property used in conducting and maintaining a nuisance under this Chapter:

All moneys paid as admission price to the exhibition of any lewd film found to be a nuisance;

All valuable consideration received for the sale of any lewd publication which is found to be a nuisance;

All money or other valuable consideration, vehicles, conveyances, or other property received or used in gambling, prostitution, the illegal sale of alcoholic beverages or the illegal sale of substances proscribed under the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, as well as the furniture and movable contents of a place used in connection with such prohibited conduct.

From and after service of a copy of the notice of hearing of the application for a preliminary injunction, provided for in

G.S. 19-2.4

upon the place, or its manager, or acting manager, or person then in charge, all such parties are deemed to have knowledge of the contents of the restraining order and the use of the place occurring thereafter. Where the circumstantial proof warrants a determination that a person had knowledge of the nuisance prior to such service of process, the court may make such finding.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 3; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 747, s. 66; 1999-371, s. 4.

§ 19-1.4.
Liability of successive owners for continuing nuisance.

After notice of a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction, every successive owner of property who neglects to abate a continuing nuisance upon, or in the use of such property, created by a former owner, is liable therefor in the same manner as the one who first created it.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 3.

§ 19-1.5.
Abatement does not preclude action.

The abatement of a nuisance does not prejudice the right of any person to recover damages for its past existence.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 3.

§ 19-2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 819, s. 4.

Cross References.

For present provisions covering the subject matter of the repealed section, see

G.S. 19-2.1

to 19-2.5.

§ 19-2.1.
Action for abatement; injunction.

Wherever a nuisance is kept, maintained, or exists, as defined in this Article, the Attorney General, district attorney, county, municipality, or any private citizen of the county may maintain a civil action in the name of the State of North Carolina to abate a nuisance under this Chapter, perpetually to enjoin all persons from maintaining the same, and to enjoin the use of any structure or thing adjudged to be a nuisance under this Chapter; provided, however, that no private citizen may maintain such action where the alleged nuisance involves the illegal possession or sale of obscene or lewd matter.

Upon request from the Attorney General, district attorney, county or municipality, including the sheriff or chief of police of any county or municipality, the Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the Department of Public Safety or any other law enforcement agency with jurisdiction may investigate alleged public nuisances and make recommendations regarding actions to abate the public nuisances.

If an action is instituted by a private person, the complainant shall execute a bond prior to the issuance of a restraining order or a temporary injunction, with good and sufficient surety to be approved by the court or clerk thereof, in the sum of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), to secure to the party enjoined the damages he may sustain if such action is wrongfully brought, not prosecuted to final judgment, or is dismissed, or is not maintained, or if it is finally decided that the temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction ought not to have been granted. The party enjoined shall have recourse against said bond for all damages suffered, including damages to his property, person, or character and including reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by him in making defense to said action. No bond shall be required of the prosecuting attorney, the Attorney General, county, or municipality, and no action shall be maintained against any public official or public entity, their employees, or agents for investigating or maintaining an action for abatement of a nuisance under the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 4; 1995, c. 528, s. 1; 1999-371, s. 5; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (n); 2014-100, s. 17.1(xxx); 2019-203, s. 9(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (n), effective January 1, 2012, in the second paragraph, substituted “Alcohol Law Enforcement Section” for “Alcohol Law Enforcement Division” and substituted “Public Safety” for “Crime Control and Public Safety.”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(xxx), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Branch” for “Section” in the second paragraph.

Session Laws 2019-203, s. 9(a), effective October 1, 2019, substituted “Division” for “Branch” in the second paragraph.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Common Law Powers of the Attorney General of North Carolina,” see 9 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1977).

For comment on taxpayers’ actions, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 397 (1977).

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1088 (1981).

For note on control of obscenity through enforcement of a nuisance statute, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 139 (1981).

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For comment discussing the constitutionality of North Carolina’s nuisance abatement statute, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 685 (1983).

§ 19-2.2.
Pleadings; jurisdiction; venue; application for preliminary injunction.

The action, provided for in this Chapter, shall be brought in the superior court of the county in which the property is located. Such action shall be commenced by the filing of a verified complaint alleging the facts constituting the nuisance. After the filing of said complaint, application for a preliminary injunction may be made to the court in which the action is filed which court shall grant a hearing within 10 days after the filing of said application.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on control of obscenity through enforcement of a nuisance statute, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 139 (1981).

§ 19-2.3.
Temporary order restraining removal of personal property from premises; service; punishment.

Where such application for a preliminary injunction is made, the court may, on application of the complainant showing good cause, issue an ex parte temporary restraining order in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 65(b), preserving the status quo and restraining the defendant and all other persons from removing or in any manner interfering with any evidence specifically described, or in any manner removing or interfering with the personal property and contents of the place where such nuisance is alleged to exist, until the decision of the court granting or refusing such preliminary injunction and until further order of the court thereon. Nothing herein shall be interpreted to allow the prior restraint of the distribution of any matter or the sale of the stock in trade, but an inventory and full accounting of all business transactions involving alleged obscene or lewd matter thereafter shall be required. The inventory provisions provided by this section shall not apply to nuisances occurring at a private dwelling place unless the court finds the private dwelling place is used for profit.

Any person, firm, or corporation enjoined pursuant to this section may file with the court a motion to dissolve any temporary restraining order. Such a motion shall be heard within 24 hours of the time a copy of the motion is served on the complaining party, or on the next day the superior courts are open in the district, whichever is later. At such hearing the complaining party shall have the burden of showing why the restraining order should be continued.

In the event a temporary restraining order is issued, it may be served in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4, or may be served by handing to and leaving a copy of such order with any person in charge of such place or residing therein, or by posting a copy thereof in a conspicuous place at or upon one or more of the principal doors or entrances to such place, or by such service under said Rule 4, delivery and posting. The officer serving such temporary restraining order shall forthwith enter upon the property and make and return into court an inventory of the personal property and contents situated in and used in conducting or maintaining such nuisance.

Any violation of such temporary restraining order is a contempt of court, and where such order is posted, mutilation or removal thereof, while the same remains in force, is a contempt of court, provided such posted order contains therein a notice to that effect.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 4; 1999-371, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to constitutionality of final order and judgment under this Article, see note to

G.S. 19-5

.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1088 (1981).

For note on control of obscenity through enforcement of a nuisance statute, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 139 (1981).

§ 19-2.4.
Notice of hearing on preliminary injunction; consolidation.

A copy of the complaint, together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing of the application for a preliminary injunction, shall be served upon the defendant at least five days before such hearing. The place may also be served by posting such papers in the same manner as is provided for in

G.S. 19-2.3

in the case of a temporary restraining order. If the hearing is then continued at the instance of any defendant, the temporary restraining order may be continued as a matter of course until the hearing.

Before or after the commencement of the hearing of an application for a preliminary injunction, the court, on application of either of the parties or on its own motion, may order the trial of the action on the merits to be advanced and consolidated with the hearing on the application for the preliminary injunction; provided, however, the defendant shall be entitled to a jury trial if requested.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on control of obscenity through enforcement of a nuisance statute, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 139 (1981).

For comment discussing the constitutionality of North Carolina’s nuisance abatement statute, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 685 (1983).

§ 19-2.5.
Hearing on the preliminary injunction; issuance.

If upon hearing, the allegations of the complaint are sustained to the satisfaction of the court, the court shall issue a preliminary injunction restraining the defendant and any other person from continuing the nuisance and effectually enjoining its use thereafter for the purpose of conducting any such nuisance. The court may, in its discretion, order the closure of the property pending trial on the merits.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 4; 1999-371, s. 7.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on control of obscenity through enforcement of a nuisance statute, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 139 (1981).

§ 19-3.
Priority of action; evidence.

The action provided for in this Chapter shall be set down for trial at the first term of the court and shall have precedence over all other cases except crimes, election contests, or injunctions.

In such action, an admission or finding of guilt of any person under the criminal laws against lewdness, assignation, prostitution, gambling, breaches of the peace, the illegal possession or sale of alcoholic beverages, or the illegal possession or sale of substances proscribed by the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, at any such place, is admissible for the purpose of proving the existence of said nuisance, and is evidence of such nuisance and of knowledge of, and of acquiescence and participation therein, on the part of the person charged with maintaining said nuisance.

At all hearings upon the merits, evidence of the general reputation of the building or place constituting the alleged nuisance, of the inmates thereof, and of those resorting thereto, is admissible for the purpose of proving the existence of such nuisance.

History.

Pub. Loc. 1913, c. 761, s. 27; 1919, c. 288; C.S., s. 3182; 1971, c. 528, s. 6; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1977, c. 819, s. 5; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 747, s. 66; 1999-371, s. 8.

Cross References.

As to admissibility of certain evidence relative to keeping disorderly houses in criminal proceedings, see § 14-188.

§ 19-4.
Violation of injunction; punishment.

In case of the violation of any injunction granted under the provisions of this Chapter, the court, or, in vacation, a judge thereof, may summarily try and punish the offender. A party found guilty of contempt under the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred ($200.00) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not less than three or more than six months, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History.

Pub. Loc. 1913, c. 761, s. 28; 1919, c. 288; C.S., s. 3183.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For comment discussing the constitutionality of North Carolina’s nuisance abatement statute, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 685 (1983).

§ 19-5.
Content of final judgment and order.

If the existence of a nuisance is admitted or established in an action as provided for in this Chapter an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case, which judgment and order shall perpetually enjoin the defendant and any other person from further maintaining the nuisance at the place complained of, and the defendant from maintaining such nuisance elsewhere within the jurisdiction of this State. Lewd matter, illegal alcoholic beverages, gambling paraphernalia, or substances proscribed under the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act shall be destroyed and not be sold.

Such order may also require the effectual closing of the place against its use thereafter for the purpose of conducting any such nuisance.

The provisions of this Article, relating to the closing of a place with respect to obscene or lewd matter, shall not apply in any order of the court to any theatre or motion picture establishment which does not, in the regular, predominant, and ordinary course of its business, show or demonstrate lewd films or motion pictures, as defined in this Article, but any such establishment may be permanently enjoined from showing such film judicially determined to be obscene hereunder and such film or motion picture shall be destroyed and all proceeds and moneys received therefrom, after the issuance of a preliminary injunction, forfeited.

History.

Pub. Loc. 1913, c. 761, s. 29; 1919, c. 288; C.S., s. 3184; 1977, c. 819, s. 6; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 747, s. 66.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 constitutional law, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 943 (1978).

§ 19-6.
Civil penalty; forfeiture; accounting; lien as to expenses of abatement; invalidation of lease.

Lewd matter is contraband, and there are no property rights therein. All personal property, including all money and other considerations, declared to be a nuisance under the provisions of

G.S. 19-1.3

and other sections of this Article, are subject to forfeiture to the local government and are recoverable as damages in the county wherein such matter is sold, exhibited or otherwise used. Such property including moneys may be traced to and shall be recoverable from persons who, under

G.S. 19-2.4

, have knowledge of the nuisance at the time such moneys are received by them.

Upon judgment against the defendant or defendants in legal proceedings brought pursuant to this Article, an accounting shall be made by such defendant or defendants of all moneys received by them which have been declared to be a nuisance under this Article. An amount equal to the sum of all moneys estimated to have been taken in as gross income from such unlawful commercial activity shall be forfeited to the general funds of the city and county governments wherein such activity took place, to be shared equally, as a forfeiture of the fruits of an unlawful enterprise, and as partial restitution for damages done to the public welfare; provided, however, that no provision of this Article shall authorize the recovery of any moneys or gross income received from the sale of any book, magazine, or exhibition of any motion picture prior to the issuance of a preliminary injunction. Where the action is brought pursuant to this Article, special injury need not be proven, and the costs of abatement are a lien on both the real and personal property used in maintaining the nuisance. Costs of abatement include, but are not limited to, reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

Upon the filing of the action, the plaintiff may file a notice of lis pendens in the official records of the county where the property is located.

If it is judicially found after an adversary hearing pursuant to this Article that a tenant or occupant of a building or tenement, under a lawful title, uses such place for the purposes of lewdness, assignation, prostitution, gambling, sale or possession of illegal alcoholic beverages or substances proscribed under the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, or repeated acts which create and constitute a breach of the peace, such use makes void the lease or other title under which he holds, at the option of the owner, and, without any act of the owner, causes the right of possession to revert and vest in such owner.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties and forfeitures provided for in this section, except for penalties and properties that accrue to local governments instead of the State, shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

Pub. Loc. 1913, c. 761, s. 30; 1919, c. 288; C.S., s. 3185; 1977, c. 819, s. 7; 1981, c. 412, s. 4; c. 747, s. 66; 1998-215, s. 106; 1999-371, s. 9.

Local Modification.

McDowell: 1959, c. 590, s. 3.

Legal Periodicals.

For note and comment on asset forfeiture, see 19 Campbell L. Rev. 527 (1997).

§ 19-6.1.
Forfeiture of real property.

In all actions where a preliminary injunction, permanent injunction, or an order of abatement is issued pursuant to this Article in which the nuisance consists of or includes at least two prior occurrences within five years of the manufacture, possession with intent to sell, or sale of controlled substances as defined by the North Carolina Controlled Substances Act, two prior occurrences of the possession of any controlled substance included within Schedule I or II of that Act, or two prior convictions within five years of violation of

G.S. 14-72.7

, the real property on which the nuisance exists or is maintained is subject to forfeiture in accordance with this section. In the case of the two prior convictions of

G.S. 14-72.7

, the convictions shall not arise out of the same transaction or occurrence.

If all of the owners of the property are defendants in the action, the plaintiff, other than a plaintiff who is a private citizen, may request forfeiture of the real property as part of the relief sought. If forfeiture is requested, and if jurisdiction over all defendant owners is established, upon judgment against the defendant or defendants, the court shall order forfeiture as follows:

If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that all the owners either (i) have participated in maintaining the nuisance on the property, or (ii) prior to the action had written notice from the plaintiff, or any governmental agent or entity authorized to bring an action pursuant to this Chapter, that the nuisance existed or was maintained on the property and have not made good faith efforts to stop the nuisance from occurring or recurring, the court shall order that the property be forfeited;

If the court finds that one or more of the owners did not participate in maintaining the nuisance on the property or did not have written notice from the plaintiff prior to the action that the nuisance existed or was maintained on the property, the court shall not order forfeiture of the property immediately upon judgment. However, if after judgment and an order directing the defendants to abate the nuisance, the nuisance either continues, begins again, or otherwise recurs within five years of the order and the defendants have not made good faith efforts to abate the nuisance, the plaintiff may petition the court for forfeiture. Upon such petition, the defendant owner or owners shall be given notice and an opportunity to appear and be heard at a hearing to determine the continuation or recurrence of the nuisance. If, in this hearing (i) the plaintiff establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the nuisance, with the owner’s or owners’ knowledge, has either continued, begun again, or otherwise recurred, and (ii) the defendants fail to establish that they have made and are continuing to make good faith efforts to abate the nuisance, the court shall order that the property be forfeited.

For the purposes of this section, factors which may evidence good faith by the defendant to abate the nuisance include but are not limited to (i) cooperation with law enforcement authorities to abate the nuisance; (ii) lease restrictions prohibiting the illegal possession or sale of narcotic drugs and an action to evict a tenant for any violations of the lease provision; (iii) a criminal record check of prospective tenants; and (iv) reference checks of prior residency of prospective tenants.

Upon an order of forfeiture, title to the property shall vest in the school board of the county in which the property is located. If at the time of forfeiture the property is subject to a lien or security interest of a person not participating in the maintenance of the nuisance, the school board shall either (i) pay an amount to that person satisfying the lien or security interest; or (ii) sell the property and satisfy the lien or security interest from the proceeds of the sale. If the property is not subject to any lien or security interest at the time of forfeiture, the school board may hold, maintain, lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of the property as it sees fit.

Upon the filing of the action, the plaintiff may file a notice of lis pendens in the official records of the county where the property is located. If the plaintiff files a notice of lis pendens, any person purchasing or obtaining an interest in the property thereafter shall be considered to have notice of the alleged nuisance, and shall forfeit his interest in the property upon a judgment of forfeiture in favor of the plaintiff.

If in the same action in which real property is forfeited the court finds that a tenant or occupant of the property participated in or maintained the nuisance, the lease or other title under which the tenant or occupant holds is void, and the right of possession vests in the new owner. Upon forfeiture, the rights of innocent tenants occupying separate units of the property who were not involved in the nuisance at the time the action was filed shall be in accordance with any relevant lease provisions in effect at the time or, in the absence of relevant lease provisions, in accordance with the law applying to other tenants or occupants of property that is sold, foreclosed upon, or otherwise obtained by new owners.

History.

1995, c. 528, s. 2; 1999-371, s. 10; 2007-178, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-178, s. 4, effective December 1, 2007, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date, in the first paragraph, inserted “or two prior convictions within five years of violation of

G.S. 14-72.7

” and made a related change in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

§ 19-7.
How order of abatement may be canceled.

If the owner appears and pays all cost of the proceeding and files a bond, with sureties to be approved by the clerk, in the full value of the property, to be ascertained by the court, or, in vacation, by the clerk of the superior court, conditioned that he will immediately abate said nuisance, and prevent the same from being established or kept within a period of one year thereafter, the court may, if satisfied of his good faith, order the premises closed under the order of abatement to be delivered to said owner, and said order of abatement canceled so far as same may relate to said property; and if the proceeding be a civil action, and said bond be given and costs therein paid before judgment and order of abatement, the action shall be thereby abated as to said building only. The release of the property under the provisions of this section shall not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty, or liability to which it may be subject by law.

History.

Pub. Loc. 1913, c. 761, s. 31; 1919, c. 288; C.S., s. 3186.

§ 19-8.
Costs.

The prevailing party shall be entitled to his costs. The court shall tax as part of the costs in any action brought hereunder such fee for the attorney prosecuting or defending the action or proceedings as may in the court’s discretion be reasonable remuneration for the services performed by such attorney.

History.

Pub. Loc. 1913, c. 761, s. 32; 1919, c. 288; C.S., s. 3187; 1977, c. 819, s. 8.

Local Modification.

McDowell: 1959, c. 590, s. 4.

§ 19-8.1.
Immunity.

The provisions of any criminal statutes with respect to the exhibition of, or the possession with the intent to exhibit, any obscene film shall not apply to a motion picture projectionist, usher, or ticket taker acting within the scope of his employment, provided that such projectionist, usher, or ticket taker: (i) Has no financial interest in the place wherein he is so employed, and (ii) freely and willingly gives testimony regarding such employment in any judicial proceedings brought under this Chapter, including pretrial discovery proceedings incident thereto, when and if such is requested, and upon being granted immunity by the trial judge sitting in such matters.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 9.

§ 19-8.2.
Right of entry.

Authorized representatives of the Commission for Public Health, any local health department or the Department of Health and Human Services, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge of a place described in

G.S. 19-1.2

, are authorized to enter without delay and at any reasonable time any such place in order to inspect and investigate during the regular hours of operation of such place.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 9; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services.”

§ 19-8.3.
Severability.

If any section, subsection, sentence, or clause of this Article is adjudged to be unconstitutional or invalid, such adjudication shall not affect the validity of the remaining portion of this Article. It is hereby declared that this Article would have been passed, and each section, sentence, or clause thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections, subsections, sentences or clauses might be adjudged to be unconstitutional, or for any other reason invalid.

History.

1977, c. 819, s. 10.

§ 19-8.4.
Human trafficking public awareness sign.

The owner, operator, or agent in charge of a business described in

G.S. 19-1.2

shall prominently display on the premises in a place that is clearly conspicuous and visible to employees and the public a public awareness sign created and provided by the North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission that contains the National Human Trafficking Resource hotline information.

History.

2017-57, s. 17.4(c); 2017-197, s. 5.8.